Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 2. Water Quality; Required Agricultural Practices and Best Management Practices

§ 4810.
Authority; cooperation; coordination.

Agricultural land use practices. In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 1259(i)

, the Secretary shall adopt by rule, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, and shall implement and enforce agricultural land use practices in order to satisfy the requirements of 33 U.S.C. § 1329 that the State identify and implement best management practices to control nonpoint sources of agricultural waste to waters of the State. These agricultural land use practices shall be created in two categories, pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Required Agricultural Practices. Required Agricultural Practices (RAPs) shall be management standards to be followed by all persons engaged in farming in this State. These standards shall address activities which have a potential for causing agricultural pollutants to enter the groundwater and waters of the State, including dairy and other livestock operations plus all forms of crop and nursery operations and on-farm or agricultural fairground, registered pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 3902

, livestock and poultry slaughter and processing activities. The RAPs shall include, as well as promote and encourage, practices for farmers in preventing agricultural pollutants from entering the groundwater and waters of the State when engaged in animal waste management and disposal, soil amendment applications, plant fertilization, and pest and weed control. Persons engaged in farming who are in compliance with these practices shall be presumed to not have a discharge of agricultural pollutants to waters of the State. RAPs shall be designed to protect water quality and shall be practical and cost-effective to implement, as determined by the Secretary. Where the Secretary determines, after inspection of a farm, that a person engaged in farming is complying with the RAPs but there still exists the potential for agricultural pollutants to enter the waters of the State, the Secretary shall require the person to implement additional, site-specific on-farm conservation practices designed to prevent agricultural pollutants from entering the waters of the State. When requiring implementation of a conservation practice under this subsection, the Secretary shall inform the person engaged in farming of the resources available to assist the person in implementing the conservation practice and complying with the requirements of this chapter. The RAPs for groundwater shall include a process under which the Agency shall receive, investigate, and respond to a complaint that a farm has contaminated the drinking water or groundwater of a property owner. A farmer may petition the Secretary to reduce the size of a perennial buffer or change the perennial buffer type based on site-specific conditions.

Best Management Practices. Best management practices (BMPs) are site-specific on-farm conservation practices implemented in order to address the potential for agricultural pollutants to enter the waters of the State. The Secretary may require any person engaged in farming to implement a BMP. When requiring implementation of a BMP, the Secretary shall inform a farmer of financial resources available from State or federal sources, private foundations, public charities, or other sources, including funding from the Clean Water Fund established under

10 V.S.A. § 1388

, to assist the person in implementing BMPs and complying with the requirements of this chapter. BMPs shall be practical and cost effective to implement, as determined by the Secretary, and shall be designed to achieve compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The Secretary may require soil monitoring or innovative manure management as a BMP under this subsection. Soil monitoring or innovative manure management implemented as a BMP shall be eligible for State assistance under the Clean Water Fund established under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 7. If a perennial buffer of trees or other woody vegetation is required as a BMP, the Secretary shall pay the farmer for a first priority easement on the land on which the buffer is located.

Cooperation and coordination. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall coordinate with the Secretary of Natural Resources in implementing and enforcing programs, plans, and practices developed for reducing and eliminating agricultural non-point source pollutants and discharges from concentrated animal feeding operations. On or before July 1, 2016, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural Resources shall revise the memorandum of understanding for the non-point program describing program administration, grant negotiation, grant sharing, and how they will coordinate watershed planning activities to comply with Pub. L. No. 92-500. The memorandum of understanding shall describe how the agencies will implement the antidegradation implementation policy, including how the agencies will apply the antidegradation implementation policy to new sources of agricultural non-point source pollutants. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural Resources shall also develop a memorandum of understanding according to the public notice and comment process of

10 V.S.A. § 1259(i)

regarding the implementation of the federal Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation Program and the relationship between the requirements of the federal Program and the State agricultural water quality requirements for large, medium, and small farms under this chapter. The memorandum of understanding shall describe Program administration, permit issuance, an appellate process, and enforcement authority and implementation. The memorandum of understanding shall be consistent with the federal National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit regulations for discharges from concentrated animal feeding operations. The allocation of duties under this chapter between the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural Resources shall be consistent with the Secretary’s duties, established under the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 1258(b)

, to comply with Pub. L. No. 92-500. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall be the State lead person in applying for federal funds under Pub. L. No. 92-500, but shall consult with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets during the process. The agricultural non-point source program may compete with other programs for competitive watershed projects funded from federal funds. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall be represented in reviewing these projects for funding. Actions by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under this chapter concerning agricultural non-point source pollution shall be consistent with the water quality standards and water pollution control requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 and the federal Clean Water Act as amended. In addition, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall coordinate with the Secretary of Natural Resources in implementing and enforcing programs, plans, and practices developed for the proper management of composting facilities when those facilities are located on a farm. On or before January 15, 2016, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural Resources shall each develop three separate measures of the performance of the agencies under the memorandum of understanding required by this subsection. Beginning on January 15, 2017, and annually thereafter, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and the Secretary of Natural Resources shall submit separate reports to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, the House Committee on Agriculture and Forestry, the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy, and the House Committee on Natural Resources, Fish, and Wildlife regarding the success of each agency in meeting the performance measures for the memorandum of understanding.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 3, 2004;

2005, No. 78

, § 1, eff. June 24, 2005;

2007, No. 38

, § 13, eff. May 21, 2007;

2009, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 3b, eff. June 1, 2010;

2015, No. 64

, § 12;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 35.

§ 4810a.
Required agricultural practices; revision.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall maintain the required agricultural practices in order to improve water quality in the State, assure practices on all farms eliminate adverse impacts to water quality, and implement the small farm certification program required by section 4871 of this title. At a minimum, the required agricultural practices shall:

Specify those farms that:

are required to comply with the small farm certification requirements under section 4871 of this title due to the potential impact of the farm or type of farm on water quality as a result of livestock managed on the farm, agricultural inputs used by the farm, or tillage practices on the farm; and

shall be subject to the required agricultural practices, but shall not be required to comply with small farm certification requirements under section 4871 of this title.

Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2), prohibit a farm from stacking or piling manure, storing fertilizer, or storing other nutrients on the farm:
(2) (A) Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2), prohibit a farm from stacking or piling manure, storing fertilizer, or storing other nutrients on the farm:

in a manner and location that presents a threat of discharge to a water of the State or presents a threat of contamination to groundwater; or

on lands in a floodway or otherwise subject to annual flooding.

Except as authorized under subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2), manure stacking or piling sites, fertilizer storage, or other nutrient storage shall not be located within 200 feet of a private well or within 200 feet of a water of the State.

The Secretary may authorize one or more of the following:

siting of manure stacking or piling sites, fertilizer storage, or other nutrient storage within 200 feet, but not less than 100 feet, of a private well or surface water if the Secretary determines that the site is the best available site on the farm for the purposes of protecting groundwater quality or surface water quality; and

siting of a waste storage facility within 200 feet of a surface water or private well if the site is the best available site on the farm for the purposes of protecting groundwater quality or surface water quality and the waste storage facility is designed by a licensed engineer to meet the requirements of section 4815 of this title.

Require the construction and management of barnyards, waste management systems, animal holding areas, and production areas in a manner to prevent runoff of waste to a surface water, to groundwater, or across property boundaries.

Establish standards for nutrient management on farms, including:

required nutrient management planning on all farms that manage agricultural wastes; and

recommended practices for improving and maintaining soil quality and healthy soils in order to increase the capacity of soil to retain water, improve flood resiliency, reduce sedimentation, reduce reliance on fertilizers and pesticides, and prevent agricultural stormwater runoff.

Require cropland on the farm to be cultivated in a manner that results in an average soil loss of less than or equal to the soil loss tolerance for the prevalent soil, known as 1T, as calculated through application of the Revised Universal Soil Loss Equation, or through the application of similarly accepted models.

Require a farm to comply with standards established by the Secretary for maintaining a vegetative buffer zone of perennial vegetation between annual croplands and the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the State. At a minimum the vegetative buffer standards established by the Secretary shall prohibit the application of manure on the farm within 25 feet of the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the State or within 10 feet of a ditch that is not a surface water under State law and that is not a water of the United States under federal law.
(6) (A) Require a farm to comply with standards established by the Secretary for maintaining a vegetative buffer zone of perennial vegetation between annual croplands and the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the State. At a minimum the vegetative buffer standards established by the Secretary shall prohibit the application of manure on the farm within 25 feet of the top of the bank of an adjoining water of the State or within 10 feet of a ditch that is not a surface water under State law and that is not a water of the United States under federal law.

Establish standards for site-specific vegetative buffers that adequately address water quality needs based on consideration of soil type, slope, crop type, proximity to water, and other relevant factors.

[Repealed.]

Regulate, in a manner consistent with the Agency of Natural Resources’ flood hazard area and river corridor rules, the construction or siting of a farm structure or the storage of manure, fertilizer, or pesticides within a river corridor designated by the Secretary of Natural Resources.

Establish standards for the exclusion of livestock from the waters of the State to prevent erosion and adverse water quality impacts.

Establish standards for soil conservation practices such as cover cropping.

Allow for alternative techniques or practices, approved by the Secretary, for compliance by an owner or operator of a farm when the owner or operator cannot comply with the requirements of the required agricultural practices due to site-specific conditions. Approved alternative techniques or practices shall meet State requirements to reduce adverse impacts to water quality.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall maintain the required agricultural practices in order to include requirements for reducing nutrient contribution to waters of the State from subsurface tile drainage. Upon adoption of requirements for subsurface tile drainage, the Secretary may require an existing subsurface tile drain to comply with the requirements of the RAPs for subsurface tile drainage upon a determination that compliance is necessary to reduce adverse impacts to water quality from the subsurface tile drain.

The Secretary shall amend the required agricultural practices to include requirements for activities occurring in areas that are excluded from regulation by the Agency of Natural Resources under

10 V.S.A. § 902

because the area is used to grow food or crops in connection with farming activities.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 4; amended

2015, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 12, 2016;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2019, No. 64

, § 6.

§ 4811.
Powers of Secretary.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter may:

Make, adopt, revise, and amend reasonable rules that define practices described in section 4810 of this title as well as other rules deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Appoint assistants, subject to applicable laws, to perform or assist in the performance of any duties or functions of the Secretary under this chapter.

Enter any lands, public or private, and review and copy any land management records as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Sign memorandums of understanding between agencies when the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets agrees it is necessary for the success of the program.

Solicit and receive federal or private funds.

Cooperate fully with the federal government or other agencies in the operation of any joint federal-state programs concerning the regulation of agricultural non-point source pollution.

Establish programs to improve agricultural water quality.

Provide grants or contracts from agricultural water quality programs established under this chapter, or by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets for the purpose of providing technical and financial assistance in preventing agricultural pollution from entering groundwater and waters of the State, provided that the Secretary shall only use capital funding available to the Agency for water quality programs or projects that are eligible for capital assistance.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2019, No. 64

, § 7.

§ 4812.
Repealed. 2015, No. 64, § 18.

§ 4813.
Basin management; appeals to the Environmental Division.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall cooperate with the Secretary of Natural Resources in the basin planning process with regard to the agricultural non-point source waste component of each basin plan. Any person with an interest in the agricultural non-point source component of the basin planning process may petition the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets to require, and the Secretary may require, best management practices in the individual basin beyond required agricultural practices adopted by rule, in order to achieve compliance with the water quality goals in

10 V.S.A. § 1250

and any duly adopted basin plan. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall hold a public hearing within 60 days and shall issue a timely written decision that sets forth the facts and reasons supporting the decision.

Any person engaged in farming that has been required by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets to implement best management practices or any person who has petitioned the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under subsection (a) of this section may appeal the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets’ decision to the Environmental Division de novo.

When requiring implementation of a best management practice, the Secretary shall inform a farmer of the resources available to assist the farmer in implementing the best management practice and complying with the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2005, No. 78

, § 3, eff. June 24, 2005;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236;

2015, No. 64

, § 14.

§ 4814.
Education and technical assistance.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets may:

Develop educational programs dealing with agricultural non-point source reduction, with the assistance of other organizations, utilizing various types of media, group meetings, tours, on-farm demonstrations and one-on-one farm visits.

Provide technical assistance, or contract for services to provide technical assistance, to qualified persons engaged in farming for reducing agricultural non-point source pollution.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 4815.
Waste storage facility.

No person shall construct a new waste storage facility or expand or modify a waste storage facility in existence on July 1, 2006 unless the facility meets the standard established for such facilities by the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the U.S. Department of Agriculture or an equivalent standard. If an equivalent design standard is used, the design and construction shall be certified by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or a licensed professional engineer operating within the scope of his or her expertise.

The Secretary may require the owner or operator of a waste storage facility in existence on July 1, 2006, to modify the facility to meet the standard set forth in subsection (a) of this section if the facility poses a threat to human health or environment as established by a violation of the State groundwater protection standards. If the Secretary determines that a facility that meets the standard set forth in subsection (a) of this section poses a threat to human health or the environment, the Secretary may require the owner or operator of the facility to implement additional management measures. The costs of initial groundwater monitoring conducted to determine if a facility poses a threat to human health or the environment shall be paid by the Secretary. Within 21 days of a determination under this subsection that a facility poses a threat to human health or the environment, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall notify the Department of Health and the Secretary of Natural Resources of the location of the facility and the name of its owner or operator.

As used in this section, “waste storage facility” means an impoundment made for the purpose of storing agricultural waste by constructing an embankment, excavating a pit or dugout, fabricating an inground and aboveground structure, or any combination thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 78

, § 4, eff. June 24, 2005; amended

2015, No. 39

, § 1.

§ 4816.
Seasonal application of manure.

Prohibition on application. A person shall not apply manure to land in the State between December 15 and April 1 of any calendar year unless authorized by this section.

Extension of prohibition. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall amend the required agricultural practices by rule in order to establish a process under which the Secretary may prohibit the application of manure to land in the State between December 1 and December 15 and between April 1 and April 30 of any calendar year when the Secretary determines that due to weather conditions, soil conditions, or other limitations, application of manure to land would pose a significant potential of discharge or runoff to State waters.

Seasonal exemption. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall amend the required agricultural practices by rule in order to establish a process under which the Secretary may authorize an exemption to the prohibition on the application of manure to land in the State between December 15 and April 1 of any calendar year or during any period established under subsection (b) of this section when manure is prohibited from application. Any process established for the issuance of an exemption under the required agricultural practices may authorize land application of manure on a weekly, monthly, or seasonal basis or in authorized regions, areas, or fields in the State, provided that any exemption shall:

prohibit application of manure:

in areas with established channels of concentrated stormwater runoff to surface waters, including ditches and ravines;

in nonharvested permanent vegetative buffers;

in a nonfarmed wetland, as that term is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 902(5)

;

within 50 feet of a potable water supply, as that term is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1972(6)

;

to fields exceeding tolerable soil loss; and

to saturated soils;

establish requirements for the application of manure when frozen or snow-covered soils prevent effective incorporation at the time of application;

require manure to be applied according to a nutrient management plan; and

establish the maximum tons of manure that may be applied per acre during any one application.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 4817.
Management of non-sewage waste.

As used in this section:

“Non-sewage waste” means any waste other than sewage that may contain organisms pathogenic to human beings but does not mean stormwater runoff.

“Sewage” means waste containing human fecal coliform and other potential pathogenic organisms from sanitary waste and used water from any building, including carriage water and shower and wash water. “Sewage” shall not mean stormwater runoff as that term is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1264

.

The Secretary may require a person transporting or arranging for the transport of non-sewage waste to a farm for deposit in a manure pit or for use as an input in a methane digester to report to the Secretary one or more of the following:

the composition of the material transported, including the source of the material; and

the volume of the material transported.

After receipt of a report required under subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary may prohibit the import of non-sewage waste onto a farm upon a determination that the import of the material would violate the nutrient management plan for the farm or otherwise present a threat to water quality.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 16; amended

2021, No. 47

, § 8.